Illinois, session 104th, HB5500.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Enterprise Zone Act is amended by 5changing Section 5.4.1 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 655/5.4.1)7    Sec. 5.4.1. Adoption of Tax Increment Financing. 8    (a) If (i) a redevelopment project area is, will be, or has 9been created by a municipality under Division 74.4 of the 10Illinois Municipal Code, (ii) the redevelopment project area 11contains property that is located in an enterprise zone, (iii) 12the municipality adopts an amendment to the enterprise zone 13designating ordinance pursuant to Section 5.4 of this Act 14specifically concerning the abatement of taxes on property 15located within a redevelopment project area created pursuant 16to Division 74.4 of the Illinois Municipal Code, and (iv) the 17Department certifies the ordinance amendment, then the 18property that is located in both the enterprise zone and the 19redevelopment project area shall not be eligible for the 20abatement of taxes under Section 18-170 of the Property Tax 21Code.22    No business enterprise or expansion or individual, 23however, that has constructed a new improvement or renovated   HB5500- 2 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1or rehabilitated an existing improvement and has received an 2abatement on the improvement under Section 18-170 of the 3Property Tax Code shall be denied any benefit previously 4extended within the zone pursuant to this Act or pursuant to 5any other Illinois law providing benefits specifically to or 6within enterprise zones. Moreover, if the business enterprise 7or individual presents evidence to the municipality within 30 8days after the adoption by the municipality of an amendment to 9the designating ordinance the sufficiency of which shall be 10determined by findings of the corporate authorities made 11within 30 days of the receipt of such evidence by the 12municipality, that before the date of the notice of the public 13hearing provided by the municipality regarding the amendment 14to the designating ordinance (i) the business enterprise or 15expansion or individual was committed to locate within the 16enterprise zone, (ii) substantial and binding financial 17obligations were made towards the development of the 18enterprise, and (iii) those commitments were made in 19reasonable reliance on the benefits and programs that were 20applicable to the enterprise or individual by reason of the 21enterprise zone, then the enterprise or expansion or 22individual shall not be denied any benefit previously extended 23within the zone pursuant to this Act or pursuant to any other 24Illinois law providing benefits specifically to or within 25enterprise zones.26    (b) This Section applies to all property located within   HB5500- 3 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1both a redevelopment project area adopted under Division 74.4 2of the Illinois Municipal Code and an enterprise zone even if 3the redevelopment project area or the enterprise zone was 4adopted before the effective date of this amendatory Act of 51997.6    (c) After July 1, 1997, if (i) a redevelopment project 7area is created by a municipality under Division 74.4 of the 8Illinois Municipal Code and (ii) the redevelopment project 9area contains property that is located in an enterprise zone, 10the municipality must adopt an amendment to the certified 11enterprise zone designating ordinance under Section 5.4 that 12property that is located in both the enterprise zone and the 13redevelopment project area shall not be eligible for any 14abatement of taxes under Section 18-170 of the Property Tax 15Code for new improvements or the renovation or rehabilitation 16of existing improvements, except as provided in subsection (e) 17and (f).18    (d) In declaratory judgment actions under this Section, 19the Department and the designating municipality shall be 20necessary parties defendant.21    (e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a 22municipality has adopted an enterprise zone pursuant to this 23Act and subsequently establishes a redevelopment project area 24pursuant to the Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act in 25the Illinois Municipal Code, the municipality may, by 26amendment to the certified enterprise zone designating   HB5500- 4 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1ordinance, provide for a partial abatement of taxes under 2Section 18-170 of the Property Tax Code for property located 3within both the enterprise zone and the redevelopment project 4area. Any portion of property taxes not abated shall be 5subject to tax increment financing, and the terms of the 6applicable redevelopment project area agreement adopted 7pursuant to the Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act. 8    (f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a 9municipality has established a redevelopment project area 10pursuant to Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act in the 11Illinois Municipal Code and subsequently adopts an enterprise 12zone that includes property within the redevelopment project 13area, the municipality may, subject to the redevelopment 14project area plan and agreement, provide for a partial 15abatement of taxes under Section 18-170 of the Property Tax 16Code for property located within both the enterprise zone and 17the redevelopment project area. No such abatement shall reduce 18or impair any tax increment revenues pledged to secure 19outstanding bonds, notes, or other obligations of the 20redevelopment project area. Any portion of property taxes not 21abated shall remain subject to tax increment financing and the 22terms of the applicable redevelopment project area agreement 23adopted pursuant to Division 74.4 of the Illinois Municipal 24Code. 25(Source: P.A. 90-258, eff. 7-30-97.)   HB5500- 5 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1    Section 10. The Statewide Innovation Development and 2Economy Act is amended by changing Sections 5-10, 5-30, 5-45, 3and 5-50, and 5-75 as follows: 4    (50 ILCS 475/5-10)5    Sec. 5-10. Definitions. In this Act:6    "Base year" means the calendar year immediately before the 7calendar year in which the Office of the Governor approves the 8first STAR bond project within the STAR bond district.9    "Commence work" means the manifest commencement of actual 10operations on the development site, such as erecting a 11building, general on-site and off-site grading and utility 12installations, commencing design and construction 13documentation, ordering lead-time materials, excavating the 14ground to lay a foundation or a basement, or work of like 15description that a reasonable person would recognize as being 16done with the intention and purpose to continue work until the 17project is completed.18    "Corporate authority" or "corporate authorities" means the 19county board of a county; the mayor and alderpersons or 20similar body when the reference is to cities; the president 21and trustees or similar body when the reference is to villages 22or incorporated towns; and the council when the reference is 23to municipalities under the commission form of government.24    "De minimis amount" means an amount less than 15% of the 25land area within a STAR bond district.  HB5500- 6 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 2Opportunity.3    "Developer" means any individual, corporation, trust, 4estate, partnership, limited liability partnership, limited 5liability company, or other entity. "Developer" does not 6include a not-for-profit entity, political subdivision, or 7other agency or instrumentality of the State.8    "Development user" means an owner, operator, licensee, 9codeveloper, subdeveloper, or tenant that: (i) operates a 10business within a STAR bond district that is a retail store, 11hotel, or entertainment venue; (ii) does not have another 12Illinois location within a 30-mile radius at the time of 13opening; and (iii) makes an initial capital investment, 14including project costs and other direct costs, of not less 15than $30,000,000 for the business.16    "Director" means the Director of Commerce and Economic 17Opportunity. 18    "Economic development region" means the counties 19encompassed within any one of the 10 economic development 20regions recognized by the Department on the effective date of 21this Act.22    "Eligible area" means contiguous parcels of real property 23that meet all of the following: (i) the property is directly 24and substantially benefited by the proposed STAR bond district 25plan; (ii) at least 50% of the total land area of the real 26property is located within an underserved area, as defined by   HB5500- 7 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1the Department at the time the STAR bond district plan is 2submitted; (iii) the property is located in an area with not 3less than 10,000 residents within a 5-mile radius of the 4proposed district; (iv) the property is located 15 miles or 5less from either a State highway or federal interstate 6highway; and (v) the area is found by the governing body of the 7political subdivision to meet the following requirements:8        (1) the use, condition, and character of the buildings 9    in the area, if any, are not consistent with the purposes 10    set forth in Section 5-5;11        (2) a STAR bond district within the area is expected 12    to create or retain job opportunities within the political 13    subdivision;14        (3) a STAR bond district within the area will serve to 15    further the development of adjacent areas; 16        (4) without the availability of STAR bonds, the 17    projects described in the STAR bond district plan would 18    not be feasible in the area;19        (5) a STAR bond district will strengthen the 20    commercial sector of the political subdivision;21        (6) a STAR bond district will enhance the tax base of 22    the political subdivision; and23        (7) the formation of a STAR bond district is in the 24    best interest of the political subdivision.25    The findings described in paragraphs (1) through (7) are 26subject to the review process provided in subsections (e) and   HB5500- 8 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1(f) of Section 5-20.2    For the purposes of this definition, the area may be 3bisected by streets, highways, roads, alleys, railways, bike 4paths, streams, rivers, and other waterways and still be 5deemed contiguous.6    "Entertainment venue" means a business that has a primary 7use of providing a venue for entertainment attractions, rides, 8or other activities oriented toward the entertainment and 9amusement of its patrons.10    "Feasibility study" means the feasibility study described 11in subsection (b) of Section 5-30. 12    "Hotel" has the same meaning given to that term in Section 132 of the Hotel Operators' Occupation Tax Act.14    "Infrastructure" means the public improvements and private 15improvements that serve the public purposes set forth in 16Section 5-5 of this Act and that benefit the STAR bond district 17or any STAR bond projects, including, but not limited to, 18streets, drives and driveways, traffic and directional signs 19and signals, parking lots and parking facilities, 20interchanges, highways, sidewalks, bridges, underpasses and 21overpasses, bike and walking trails, sanitary storm sewers and 22lift stations, drainage conduits, channels, levees, canals, 23storm water detention and retention facilities, utilities and 24utility connections, water mains and extensions, and street 25and parking lot lighting and connections.26    "Local hotel tax" means any taxes received by a   HB5500- 9 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1municipality, county, or other local government entity arising 2from transactions by all persons engaged in the business of 3renting, leasing, or letting rooms in a hotel, as defined in 4the Hotel Operators' Occupation Tax Act, within a STAR bond 5district, imposed pursuant to Section 8-3-14 of the Illinois 6Municipal Code or Section 5-1030 of the Counties Code. 7    "Local sales taxes" means any locally imposed taxes 8received by a municipality, county, or other local 9governmental entity arising from sales by retailers and 10servicemen within a STAR bond district. "Local sales taxes" 11includes business district sales taxes, taxes imposed under 12Section 5-50, and that portion of the net revenue allocated 13from the Local Government Tax Fund and the County and Mass 14Transit District Fund to the municipality, county, or other 15governmental entity under the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, 16the Use Tax Act, the Service Use Tax Act, and the Service 17Occupation Tax Act from transactions at places of business 18located in a STAR bond district. "Local sales taxes" includes 19all the net revenue realized under any local hotel tax. "Local 20sales taxes" does not include (i) any taxes authorized under 21the Local Mass Transit District Act or the Metro-East Park and 22Recreation District Act for so long as the applicable taxing 23district does not impose a tax on real property, (ii) any 24county school facility and resources occupation taxes imposed 25under Section 5-1006.7 of the Counties Code, (iii) any taxes 26authorized under the Flood Prevention District Act, (iv) any   HB5500- 10 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1taxes authorized under the Special County Occupation Tax For 2Public Safety, Public Facilities, Mental Health, Substance 3Abuse, or Transportation Law, (v) any taxes authorized under 4the Regional Transportation Authority Act, (vi) any taxes 5authorized under the County Motor Fuel Tax Law, or (vii) any 6taxes authorized under the Municipal Motor Fuel Tax Law, or 7(viii) any taxes committed to other uses by election of voters 8or pledged to any bond repayment, other than STAR bonds, prior 9to the approval of the STAR bond project.10    "Local sales tax increment" means:11        (1) with respect to local sales taxes administered by 12    a municipality, county, or other unit of local government, 13    that portion of the local sales tax that is in excess of 14    the aggregate local sales tax in the district for the same 15    month in the base year, as determined by the respective 16    municipality, county, or other unit of local government; 17    the Department of Revenue shall allocate the local sales 18    tax increment only if the local sales tax is administered 19    by the Department; and20        (2) with respect to local sales taxes administered by 21    the Department of Revenue:22            (A) except with respect to the 0.25% county 23        portion of the 6.25% State rate, all the local sales 24        tax paid by taxpayers in the district that is in excess 25        of the aggregate local sales tax paid by taxpayers in 26        the district for the same month in the base year, as   HB5500- 11 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1        determined by the Department of Revenue; and2            (B) with respect to the 0.25% county portion of 3        the 6.25% State rate, in the case of a STAR bond 4        district that is partially or wholly within a 5        municipality, that portion of the 0.25% county portion 6        of the 6.25% rate paid by taxpayers in the district for 7        sales made within the corporate limits of the 8        municipality that is in excess of the aggregate local 9        sales tax paid by taxpayers in the district for sales 10        made within the corporate limits of the municipality 11        for the same month in the base year, as determined by 12        the Department of Revenue, but only if the corporate 13        authorities of the county adopt an ordinance, and file 14        a copy of the ordinance with the Department of Revenue 15        within the same time frames as required for STAR bond 16        occupation taxes under Section 5-50, that designates 17        the taxes as part of the local sales tax increment 18        under this Act.19        (3) with respect to any local hotel tax that is 20    administered and collected directly by a municipality, 21    that portion of the local hotel tax revenues that is in 22    excess of the amount of such tax revenues generated within 23    the STAR bond district that are in excess of the aggregate 24    hotel tax revenues generated within the district for the 25    same month in the base year, as determined by the 26    political subdivision.   HB5500- 12 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1    "Market study" means a study to determine the ability of 2the proposed STAR bond project to gain market share locally 3and regionally and to remain profitable after the term of 4repayment of STAR bonds.5    "Master developer" means a developer cooperating with a 6political subdivision to plan, develop, and implement a STAR 7bond project plan for a STAR bond district. Subject to the 8limitations of Section 5-40, the master developer may work 9with and transfer certain development rights to other 10developers for the purpose of implementing STAR bond project 11plans and achieving the purposes of this Act. A master 12developer for a STAR bond district shall be appointed by a 13political subdivision in the resolution establishing the STAR 14bond district, and the master developer or its affiliate must, 15at the time of appointment, own or have control of, through 16purchase agreements, option contracts, or other means, not 17less than 50% of the acreage within the STAR bond district. 18"Master developer" also means any successor developer who has 19assumed the role and responsibilities of the original master 20developer through the execution of an amended master 21development agreement and has been approved as the master 22developer through resolution by the applicable political 23subdivision.24    "Master development agreement" means an agreement between 25the master developer (or any approved successor developers) 26and the political subdivision to govern a STAR bond district   HB5500- 13 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1and any STAR bond projects.2    "Municipality" means the city, village, or incorporated 3town in which a proposed STAR bond district is located. 4    "New Opportunities for Vacation and Adventure District" or 5"NOVA district" means a STAR bond district that encompasses a 6minimum of 500 contiguous acres and, during the STAR bond 7district plan approval process, demonstrates a reasonable 8expectation of (1) producing a capital investment of at least 9$500,000,000, (2) generating not less than $300,000,000 in 10annual gross sales, (3) attracting at least 1,000,000 visitors 11annually, and (4) creating a minimum of 1,500 jobs.12    "Pledged STAR revenues" means those sales tax revenues and 13other sources of funds that are pledged to pay debt service on 14STAR bonds or to pay project costs under Section 5-45. 15Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any 16State sales tax increment or local sales tax increment from a 17retail entity initiating operations in a STAR bond district 18while terminating operations at another Illinois location 19within 25 miles of the STAR bond district shall not constitute 20pledged STAR revenues or be available to pay principal and 21interest on STAR bonds. For purposes of this definition, 22"terminating operations" means a closing of a retail operation 23that is directly related to the opening of the same operation 24or like retail entity owned or operated by more than 50% of the 25original ownership in a STAR bond district within one year 26before or after initiating operations in the STAR bond   HB5500- 14 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1district, but it does not mean closing an operation for 2reasons beyond the control of the retail entity, as documented 3by the retail entity, subject to a reasonable finding by the 4municipality (or county if such retail operation is not 5located within a municipality) in which the terminated 6operations were located that the closed location contained 7inadequate space, had become economically obsolete, or was no 8longer a viable location for the retailer or serviceperson.9    "Political subdivision" means a municipality or county 10that undertakes to establish a STAR bond district under the 11provisions of this Act.12    "Professional sports" means any of the following sports at 13the major league level: baseball, basketball, football, or ice 14hockey.15    "Project costs" means the total of all costs incurred or 16estimated to be incurred on or after the date of establishment 17of a STAR bond district that are reasonable or necessary to 18implement a STAR bond district plan or any STAR bond project 19plans, or both, including costs incurred for public 20improvements and private improvements that serve the public 21purposes set forth in Section 5-5 of this Act. "Project costs" 22includes, without limitation:23        (1) costs of studies, surveys, development of plans 24    and specifications, formation, implementation, and 25    administration of a STAR bond district, STAR bond district 26    plan, any STAR bond projects, or any STAR bond project   HB5500- 15 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1    plans, including, but not limited to, staff and 2    professional service costs for architectural, engineering, 3    legal, financial, planning, or other services; however, no 4    charges for professional services may be based on a 5    percentage of the tax increment collected, and no 6    contracts for professional services, excluding 7    architectural and engineering services, may be entered 8    into if the terms of the contract extend beyond a period of 9    3 years;10        (2) property assembly costs, including, but not 11    limited to, costs related to:12            (A) the acquisition of land and other real 13        property or rights or interests in the land or other 14        real property located within the boundaries of a STAR 15        bond district;16            (B) the demolition of buildings, site preparation, 17        and site improvements that serve as an engineered 18        barrier addressing ground level or below ground 19        environmental contamination, including, but not 20        limited to, parking lots and other concrete or asphalt 21        barriers; and22            (C) the clearing and grading of land and the 23        importing of additional soil and fill materials or the 24        removal of soil and fill materials from the site;25        (3) subject to paragraph (6), the costs of buildings 26    and other vertical improvements that are located within   HB5500- 16 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1    the boundaries of a STAR bond district and are owned by a 2    political subdivision or other public entity, including 3    without limitation police and fire stations, educational 4    facilities, and public restrooms and rest areas;5        (4) costs of buildings and other vertical improvements 6    that are located within: (i) the boundaries of a STAR bond 7    district and are owned by a development user, except that 8    only 4 development users, other than a hotel or 9    entertainment venue, in a STAR bond district and one hotel 10    are eligible to include the cost of those vertical 11    improvements as project costs, or (ii) the boundaries of a 12    NOVA district;13        (5) costs of the following vertical improvements that 14    are located within (i) the boundaries of a STAR bond 15    district and owned by an entertainment venue, except that 16    only one entertainment venue in a STAR bond district is 17    eligible to include the cost of those vertical 18    improvements as project costs, or (ii) a NOVA district:19            (A) buildings;20            (B) rides and attractions, including, but not 21        limited to, carousels, slides, roller coasters, 22        displays, models, towers, works of art, and similar 23        theme and amusement park improvements; and24            (C) other vertical improvements;25        (6) costs of the design and construction of 26    infrastructure and public works located within the   HB5500- 17 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1    boundaries of a STAR bond district that are reasonable or 2    necessary to implement a STAR bond district plan or any 3    STAR bond project plans, or both, except that "project 4    costs" does not include the cost of constructing a new 5    municipal public building principally used to provide 6    offices, storage space, or conference facilities or 7    vehicle storage, maintenance, or repair for 8    administrative, public safety, or public works personnel 9    and that is not intended to replace an existing public 10    building unless the political subdivision makes a 11    reasonable determination in a STAR bond district plan or 12    any STAR bond project plans, supported by information that 13    provides the basis for that determination, that the new 14    municipal building is required to meet an increase in the 15    need for public safety purposes anticipated to result from 16    the implementation of the STAR bond district plan or any 17    STAR bond project plans;18        (7) costs of the design and construction of the 19    following improvements located outside the boundaries of a 20    STAR bond district if the costs are essential to further 21    the purpose and development of a STAR bond district plan 22    and either (i) part of and connected to sewer, water, or 23    utility service lines that physically connect to the STAR 24    bond district or (ii) significant improvements for 25    adjacent off-site highways, streets, roadways, and 26    interchanges that are approved by the Department of   HB5500- 18 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1    Transportation. No other cost of infrastructure and public 2    works improvements located outside the boundaries of a 3    STAR bond district may be deemed project costs;4        (8) costs of job training and retraining projects for 5    current and future employees of development users, 6    including programs implemented by businesses located 7    within a STAR bond district;8        (9) financing costs, including, but not limited to, 9    all necessary and incidental expenses related to the 10    issuance of obligations and the payment of interest on any 11    obligations issued under this Act, including interest 12    accruing during the estimated period of construction of 13    any improvements in a STAR bond district or any STAR bond 14    projects for which such obligations are issued and for not 15    exceeding 36 months thereafter and including reasonable 16    reserves related thereto;17        (10) interest costs incurred by a developer for 18    project costs related to the acquisition, formation, 19    implementation, development, construction, and 20    administration of a STAR bond district, STAR bond district 21    plan, STAR bond projects, or any STAR bond project plans 22    if:23            (A) payment of the costs in any one year may not 24        exceed 30% of the annual interest costs incurred by 25        the developer with regard to the STAR bond district or 26        any STAR bond projects during that year; and  HB5500- 19 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1            (B) the total of the interest payments paid under 2        this Act may not exceed 30% of the total cost paid or 3        incurred by the developer for a STAR bond district or 4        STAR bond projects, plus project costs, excluding any 5        property assembly costs incurred by a political 6        subdivision under this Act;7        (11) to the extent the political subdivision by 8    written agreement accepts and approves the same, all or a 9    portion of a taxing district's capital costs resulting 10    from a STAR bond district or STAR bond projects 11    necessarily incurred or to be incurred within a taxing 12    district in furtherance of the objectives of a STAR bond 13    district plan or STAR bond project plans;14        (12) costs of common areas located within the 15    boundaries of a STAR bond district;16        (13) costs of landscaping and plantings, retaining 17    walls and fences, artificial lakes and ponds, shelters, 18    benches, lighting, and similar amenities located within 19    the boundaries of a STAR bond district;20        (14) costs of mounted building signs, site monuments, 21    and pylon signs located within the boundaries of a STAR 22    bond district; or23        (15) if included in the STAR bond district plan and 24    approved in writing by the Director, salaries or a portion 25    of salaries for local government employees to the extent 26    the same are directly attributable to the work of those   HB5500- 20 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1    employees on the establishment and management of a STAR 2    bond district or any STAR bond project.3    Except as specified in items (1) through (15) of this 4definition, "project costs" does not include:5        (A) the cost of construction of buildings that are 6    owned by a municipality or county and leased to a 7    development user for uses other than as a retail store, 8    hotel, or entertainment venue;9        (B) moving expenses for employees of the businesses 10    locating within the STAR bond district;11        (C) property taxes for property located in the STAR 12    bond district;13        (D) lobbying costs; and14        (E) general overhead or administrative costs of the 15    political subdivision that would still have been incurred 16    by the political subdivision if the political subdivision 17    had not established a STAR bond district.18    "Project development agreement" means any one or more 19agreements, including any amendments to that agreement or 20those agreements, between a master developer and any 21codeveloper or subdeveloper in connection with a STAR bond 22project, which project development agreement may include the 23political subdivision as a party.24    "Project labor agreement" means a prehire collective 25bargaining agreement that covers all terms and conditions of 26employment between the general contractor and all   HB5500- 21 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1subcontractors hired by the master developer, developer, 2codeveloper, or subdeveloper, as applicable, of a STAR bond 3project. A "project labor agreement" must include the 4following provisions: (1) a provision establishing the minimum 5hourly wage for each class of labor organization employee; (2) 6a provision establishing the benefits and other compensation 7for each class of labor organization employee; (3) a provision 8requiring that no strike or dispute will be engaged in by the 9labor organization employees; (4) a provision requiring that 10no lockout or dispute will be engaged in by the general 11contractor and all subcontractors building the project; and 12(5) a provision establishing goals for apprenticeship hours to 13be performed by minority persons and women and goals for total 14hours to be performed by minority persons and women, as those 15terms are defined in the Business Enterprise for Minorities, 16Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act. A "project labor 17agreement" may include other terms and conditions as 18necessary.19    "Projected market area" means any area within the State in 20which a STAR bond district or STAR bond project is projected to 21have a significant fiscal or market impact as determined by 22the Director.23    "Resolution" means a resolution, order, ordinance, or 24other appropriate form of legislative action of a political 25subdivision or other applicable public entity approved by a 26vote of a majority of a quorum at a meeting of the governing   HB5500- 22 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1body of the political subdivision or applicable public entity.2    "STAR bond" means a sales tax and revenue bond, note, or 3other obligation payable from pledged STAR revenues and issued 4by a political subdivision, the proceeds of which shall be 5used only to pay project costs as defined in this Act.6    "STAR bond district" means the specific area that is 7declared to be an eligible area by the political subdivision, 8that has received approval by the State, and in which the 9political subdivision may develop one or more STAR bond 10projects.11    "STAR bond district plan" means the preliminary or 12conceptual plan that generally identifies the proposed STAR 13bond project areas and identifies in a general manner the 14buildings, facilities, and improvements to be constructed or 15improved in each STAR bond project area.16    "STAR bond project" means a project that is located within 17a STAR bond district and that is approved under Section 5-30.18    "STAR bond project area" means the geographic area within 19a STAR bond district in which there may be one or more STAR 20bond projects.21    "STAR bond project plan" means the written plan adopted by 22a political subdivision for the development of a STAR bond 23project in a STAR bond district; the plan may include, but is 24not limited to, (i) project costs incurred prior to the date of 25the STAR bond project plan and estimated future STAR bond 26project costs, (ii) proposed sources of funds to pay those   HB5500- 23 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1costs, (iii) the nature and estimated term of any obligations 2to be issued by the political subdivision to pay those costs, 3(iv) the most recent equalized assessed valuation of the STAR 4bond project area, (v) an estimate of the equalized assessed 5valuation of the STAR bond district or applicable project area 6after completion of a STAR bond project, (vi) a general 7description of the types of any known or proposed developers, 8users, or tenants of the STAR bond project or projects 9included in the plan, (vii) a general description of the type, 10structure, and character of the property or facilities to be 11developed or improved, (viii) a description of the general 12land uses to apply to the STAR bond project, and (ix) a general 13description or an estimate of the type, class, and number of 14employees to be employed in the operation of the STAR bond 15project.16    "State sales tax" means all the net revenue realized under 17the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, the Use Tax Act, the 18Service Use Tax Act, the Hotel Operators' Occupation Tax Act, 19and the Service Occupation Tax Act from transactions at places 20of business located within a STAR bond district, excluding 21that portion of the net revenue realized under the Retailers' 22Occupation Tax Act, the Use Tax Act, the Service Use Tax Act, 23and the Service Occupation Tax Act from transactions at places 24of business located within a STAR bond district that is 25deposited into the Local Government Tax Fund and the County 26and Mass Transit District Fund.  HB5500- 24 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1    "State sales tax increment" means:2        (1) with respect to all STAR bond districts that do 3    not qualify as NOVA districts:4            (A) 100% of that portion of the aggregate State 5        sales tax that is in excess of the aggregate State 6        sales tax for the same month in the base year, as 7        determined by the Department of Revenue, from 8        transactions at up to 4 development users located 9        within a STAR bond district, which development users 10        shall be designated by the master developer and 11        approved by the political subdivision and the Director 12        of Revenue in conjunction with the applicable STAR 13        bond project approval; and14            (B) 25% of that portion of the aggregate State 15        sales tax that is in excess of the aggregate State 16        sales tax for the same month in the base year, as 17        determined by the Department of Revenue from all other 18        transactions within a STAR bond district; and19        (2) with respect to all NOVA districts:20            (A) 100% of that portion of the State sales tax 21        that is in excess of the State sales tax for the same 22        month in the base year, as determined by the 23        Department of Revenue, from transactions at up to 4 24        development users located, which development users 25        shall be designated by the master developer and 26        approved by the political subdivision and the Director   HB5500- 25 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1        of Revenue in conjunction with the applicable STAR 2        bond project approval; and 3            (B) 50% of that portion of the State sales tax that 4        is in excess of the State sales tax for the same month 5        in the base year from all other transactions within 6        the NOVA district.7    "Substantial change" means a change in which the proposed 8STAR bond project plan differs substantially in size, scope, 9or use from the approved STAR bond district plan or STAR bond 10project plan.11    "Taxpayer" means an individual, partnership, corporation, 12limited liability company, trust, estate, or other entity that 13is subject to the Illinois Income Tax Act.14    "Total development costs" means the aggregate public and 15private investment in a STAR bond district, including project 16costs and other direct and indirect costs related to the 17development of the STAR bond district.18    "Underserved area" has the meaning given to that term in 19Section 5-5 of the Economic Development for a Growing Economy 20Tax Credit Act.21    "Vacant" means that portion of the land in a proposed STAR 22bond district that is not occupied by a building, facility, or 23other vertical improvement.24(Source: P.A. 104-453, eff. 12-12-25.) 25    (50 ILCS 475/5-30)  HB5500- 26 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1    Sec. 5-30. Approval of STAR bond projects. 2    (a) The corporate authorities of a political subdivision 3seeking to establish a STAR bond project in an approved STAR 4bond district must submit a proposed STAR bond project plan to 5the Department, the Department of Revenue, and the Governor's 6Office of Management and Budget on or before June 1, 2028. A 7STAR bond project which is partially outside the boundaries of 8a municipality must also be approved by the corporate 9authorities of the county by resolution.10    After the establishment of a STAR bond district, the 11master developer may propose a STAR bond project to a 12political subdivision, and the master developer shall, in 13cooperation with the political subdivision, prepare a STAR 14bond project plan in consultation with the planning commission 15of the political subdivision, if any. The STAR bond project 16plan may be implemented in separate development stages.17    (b) Any political subdivision considering a STAR bond 18project within a STAR bond district shall cause to be prepared 19an independent feasibility study. The feasibility study shall 20be prepared by a feasibility consultant approved by the 21Department. The feasibility consultant shall provide certified 22copies of the feasibility study to the political subdivision, 23the Department, the Department of Revenue, and the Governor's 24Office of Management and Budget. The feasibility study shall 25include the following:26        (1) the estimated amount of pledged STAR revenues   HB5500- 27 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1    expected to be collected in each year through the maturity 2    date of the proposed STAR bonds;3        (2) a statement of how the jobs and taxes obtained 4    from the STAR bond project will contribute significantly 5    to the economic development of the State and region;6        (3) visitation expectations;7        (4) the unique quality of the project;8        (5) an economic impact study;9        (6) a market study;10        (7) current and anticipated infrastructure analysis;11        (8) integration and collaboration with other resources 12    or businesses;13        (9) the quality of service and experience provided, as 14    measured against national consumer standards for the 15    specific target market;16        (10) project accountability, measured according to 17    best industry practices;18        (11) the expected return on State and local investment 19    that the STAR bond project is anticipated to produce; and20        (12) an anticipated principal and interest payment 21    schedule on the STAR bonds.22    The feasibility consultant, along with any other 23consultants commissioned to perform the studies and other 24analysis required by the feasibility study, shall be selected 25by the political subdivision but approved by the Department. 26The consultants shall be retained by the political   HB5500- 28 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1subdivision. The political subdivision may seek reimbursement 2from the master developer.3    The failure to include all information enumerated in this 4subsection in the feasibility study for a STAR bond project 5shall not affect the validity of STAR bonds issued under this 6Act.7    (c) If the political subdivision determines the STAR bond 8project is feasible, the STAR bond project plan shall include:9        (1) a summary of the feasibility study;10        (2) a reference to the STAR bond district plan that 11    identifies the STAR bond project area that is set forth in 12    the STAR bond project plan that is being considered;13        (3) a legal description and map of the STAR bond 14    project area to be developed or redeveloped;15        (4) a description of the buildings and facilities 16    proposed to be constructed or improved in the STAR bond 17    project area, including development users, as applicable;18        (5) a copy of letters of intent to locate within the 19    STAR bond district signed by both the master developer and 20    the appropriate corporate officer of at least one 21    development user for the STAR bond project proposed within 22    the district; 23        (6) a copy of a project labor agreement entered into 24    by the master developer and a commitment by the master 25    developer, other developers, contractors, and 26    subcontractors to comply with the requirements of Section   HB5500- 29 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1    30-22 of the Illinois Procurement Code as they apply to 2    responsible bidders; and3        (7) any other information the corporate authorities of 4    the political subdivision deems reasonable and necessary 5    to advise the public of the intent of the STAR bond project 6    plan.7    (d) Before a political subdivision may hold a public 8hearing to consider a STAR bond project plan, the political 9subdivision must apply to the Department, the Department of 10Revenue, and the Governor's Office of Management and Budget 11for joint review and recommendation and ultimate approval or 12denial by the Office of the Governor of the STAR bond project 13plan. The corporate authorities of a political subdivision 14seeking to establish a STAR bond project in an approved STAR 15bond district must submit a proposed STAR bond project plan to 16the Department, the Department of Revenue, and the Governor's 17Office of Management and Budget by June 1, 2028 for 18consideration.19    An application for approval of a STAR bond project plan 20must not be approved by the State unless all the components of 21the feasibility study set forth in paragraphs (1) through (12) 22of subsection (b) have been completed and submitted for review 23and recommendation for approval or denial. In addition to 24reviewing all the other elements of the STAR bond project plan 25required under subsection (c), which must be included in the 26application and include a letter of intent as required under   HB5500- 30 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1paragraph (5) of subsection (c) in order to receive State 2approval, the Department, the Department of Revenue, and the 3Governor's Office of Management and Budget must review the 4feasibility study and consider all the components of the 5feasibility study set forth in paragraphs (1) through (12) of 6subsection (b), including, without limitation, the economic 7impact study and the financial benefit of the proposed STAR 8bond project to the local, regional, and State economies, the 9proposed adverse impacts on similar businesses and projects as 10well as municipalities within the market area, and the net 11effect of the proposed STAR bond project on the local, 12regional, and State economies. In addition to the economic 13impact study, the political subdivision must also submit to 14the agencies, as part of its application, the financial and 15other information that substantiates the basis for the 16conclusion of the economic impact study, in the form and 17manner as required by the agencies, so that the agencies can 18verify the results of the study. In addition to any other 19criteria in this subsection, the State may not approve the 20STAR bond project plan unless the agencies are satisfied that 21the proposed development users are, in fact, true development 22users and find that the STAR bond project plan is in accordance 23with the purpose of this Act and the public interest. As part 24of the review, the agencies shall evaluate the conclusions of 25the feasibility study as it relates to the projected State and 26local sales tax increments expected to be generated in the   HB5500- 31 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1STAR bond district. The Department, the Department of Revenue, 2and the Governor's Office of Management and Budget shall 3jointly recommend the approval of a STAR bond project plan. In 4making the recommendation, the agencies shall consider the 5proximity of a proposed STAR bond project to another proposed 6or existing STAR bond project. Notwithstanding any other 7provision of this Act, the Department, the Department of 8Revenue, and the Governor's Office of Management and Budget 9shall not approve any STAR bond project plan that includes as 10part of the plan the development of any facility, stadium, 11arena, or other structure if: (1) the purpose of the facility, 12stadium, arena, or other structure is the holding of 13professional sports contests; or (2) the facility, stadium, 14arena, or other structure is within a one-mile radius of any 15structure that is developed on or after the effective date of 16this Act and has as one of its purposes the holding of 17professional sports contests. The agencies shall send a copy 18of their written findings and recommended approval or denial 19of the STAR bond project plan to the Office of the Governor for 20final action. Upon receipt of the Director's written findings 21and recommendation, the Office of the Governor shall issue a 22final approval or denial of the STAR bond project plan based on 23the criteria in this subsection and Section 5-15 and send a 24written approval or denial to the requesting political 25subdivision. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for 26STAR bond districts designated as NOVA districts, the Office   HB5500- 32 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1of the Governor shall issue a final approval or denial of the 2STAR bond project plan based on the criteria in this 3subsection and Section 5-15 and send written approval or 4denial to the requesting political subdivision within 180 days 5after the political subdivision applies for approval, as set 6out in this subsection (d). In granting its approval, the 7Office of the Governor may require the political subdivision 8to execute a binding agreement or memorandum of understanding 9with the State. The terms of the agreement or memorandum may 10include, among other things, the political subdivision's 11repayment of the State sales tax increment distributed to it 12if any violation of the agreement or memorandum or this Act 13occurs.14    (e) Upon a finding by the planning and zoning commission 15of the political subdivision, if any, that the STAR bond 16project plan is consistent with the intent of the 17comprehensive plan for the development of the political 18subdivision and upon issuance of written approval of the STAR 19bond project plan from the Office of the Governor under 20subsection (d) of this Section, the corporate authorities of 21the political subdivision shall adopt a resolution stating 22that the political subdivision is considering the adoption of 23the STAR bond project plan. The resolution shall:24        (1) give notice that a public hearing will be held to 25    consider the adoption of the STAR bond project plan and 26    fix the date, hour, and place of the public hearing;  HB5500- 33 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1        (2) describe the general boundaries of the STAR bond 2    district within which the STAR bond project will be 3    located and the date of establishment of the STAR bond 4    district;5        (3) describe the general boundaries of the area 6    proposed to be included within the STAR bond project area;7        (4) provide that the STAR bond project plan and map of 8    the area to be redeveloped or developed are available for 9    inspection during regular office hours in the offices of 10    the political subdivision; and11        (5) contain a summary of the terms and conditions of 12    any proposed project development agreement with the 13    political subdivision.14    (f) A public hearing shall be conducted to consider the 15adoption of any STAR bond project plan.16        (1) The date fixed for the public hearing to consider 17    the adoption of the STAR bond project plan shall be not 18    less than 20 nor more than 90 days following the date of 19    the adoption of the resolution fixing the date of the 20    hearing.21        (2) A copy of the political subdivision's resolution 22    providing for the public hearing shall be sent by 23    certified mail, return receipt requested, to the corporate 24    authorities of the county. A copy of the political 25    subdivision's resolution providing for the public hearing 26    shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested,   HB5500- 34 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1    to each person or persons in whose name the general taxes 2    for the last preceding year were paid on each parcel of 3    land lying within the proposed STAR bond project area 4    within 10 days following the date of the adoption of the 5    resolution. The resolution shall be published once in a 6    newspaper of general circulation in the political 7    subdivision not less than one week nor more than 3 weeks 8    before the date fixed for the public hearing. A map or 9    aerial photo clearly delineating the area of land proposed 10    to be included within the STAR bond project area shall be 11    published with the resolution.12        (3) The hearing shall be held at a location that is 13    within 20 miles of the STAR bond district in a facility 14    that can accommodate a large crowd is accessible to 15    persons with disabilities.16        (4) At the public hearing, a representative of the 17    political subdivision or master developer shall present 18    the STAR bond project plan. Following the presentation of 19    the STAR bond project plan, all interested persons shall 20    be given an opportunity to be heard. The corporate 21    authorities may continue the date and time of the public 22    hearing.23    (g) Upon conclusion of the public hearing, the governing 24body of the political subdivision may adopt the STAR bond 25project plan by a resolution approving the STAR bond project 26plan.  HB5500- 35 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1    (h) After the adoption by the corporate authorities of the 2political subdivision of a STAR bond project plan, the 3political subdivision may enter into a project development 4agreement if the master developer has requested the political 5subdivision to be a party to the project development agreement 6under subsection (b) of Section 5-40.7    (i) Within 30 days after the adoption by the political 8subdivision of a STAR bond project plan, the clerk of the 9political subdivision shall transmit a copy of the legal 10description of the land and a list of all new and existing 11mailing addresses within the STAR bond district, a copy of the 12resolution adopting the STAR bond project plan, and a map or 13plat indicating the boundaries of the STAR bond project area 14and STAR bond district to the clerk, treasurer, and governing 15body of the county and to the Department and Department of 16Revenue. Within 30 days of creation of any new mailing address 17within a STAR bond district, the clerk of the political 18subdivision shall provide written notice of that new address 19to the Department and the Department of Revenue.20     If a certified copy of the resolution adopting the STAR 21bond project plan is filed with the Department of Revenue on or 22before the first day of April, the Department of Revenue, if 23all other requirements of this subsection are met, shall 24proceed to collect and allocate any local sales tax increment 25and any State sales tax increment in accordance with the 26provisions of this Act on the first day of July next following   HB5500- 36 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1the adoption and filing. If a certified copy of the resolution 2adopting the STAR bond project plan is filed with the 3Department of Revenue after April 1 but on or before the first 4day of October, the Department of Revenue, if all other 5requirements of this subsection are met, shall proceed to 6collect and allocate any local sales tax increment and any 7State sales tax increment in accordance with the provisions of 8this Act as of the first day of January next following the 9adoption and filing. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any local 10sales tax increment derived from local hotel taxes and visitor 11investment surcharges that are designated as pledged STAR 12revenues pursuant to this Act shall be calculated, collected, 13and administered by the political subdivision imposing such 14tax, and shall not be subject to collection or allocation by 15the Department of Revenue. 16    Any substantial changes to a STAR bond project plan as 17adopted shall be subject to a public hearing following 18publication of notice thereof in a newspaper of general 19circulation in the political subdivision and approval by 20resolution of the governing body of the political subdivision.21    The Department of Revenue shall not collect or allocate 22any local sales tax increment or State sales tax increment 23until the political subdivision also provides, in the manner 24prescribed by the Department of Revenue, the boundaries of the 25STAR bond district and each address in the STAR bond district 26in such a way that the Department of Revenue can determine by   HB5500- 37 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1its address whether a business is located in the STAR bond 2district. The political subdivision must provide this boundary 3and address information to the Department of Revenue, with a 4copy to the Department, on or before April 1 for 5administration and enforcement under this Act by the 6Department of Revenue beginning on the following July 1 and on 7or before October 1 for administration and enforcement under 8this Act by the Department of Revenue beginning on the 9following January 1. The Department of Revenue shall not 10administer or enforce any change made to the boundaries of a 11STAR bond district or any address change, addition, or 12deletion until the political subdivision reports the boundary 13change or address change, addition, or deletion to the 14Department of Revenue, with a copy to the Department, in the 15manner prescribed by the Department of Revenue. The political 16subdivision must provide this boundary change or address 17change, addition, or deletion information to the Department of 18Revenue, with a copy to the Department, on or before April 1 19for administration and enforcement by the Department of 20Revenue of the change, addition, or deletion beginning on the 21following July 1 and on or before October 1 for administration 22and enforcement by the Department of Revenue of the change, 23addition, or deletion beginning on the following January 1. If 24a retailer is incorrectly included or excluded from the list 25of those located in the STAR bond district, the Department of 26Revenue shall be held harmless if the Department reasonably   HB5500- 38 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1relied on information provided by the political subdivision.2    (j) Any STAR bond project must be approved by the 3political subdivision within 23 years after the date of the 4approval of the STAR bond district; however, any amendments to 5the STAR bond project may occur following that date.6    (k) Any developer of a STAR bond project shall commence 7work on the STAR bond project within 3 years from the date of 8adoption of the STAR bond project plan. If the developer fails 9to commence work on the STAR bond project within the 3-year 10period, funding for the project shall cease and the developer 11of the project or complex shall have one year to appeal to the 12political subdivision for a one-time reapproval of the project 13and funding. If the project is reapproved, the 3-year period 14for commencement shall begin again on the date of the 15reapproval. If the project is not reapproved or if the 16developer again fails to commence work on the STAR bond 17project within the second 3-year period, the project shall be 18terminated, and the Department may accept applications for a 19new STAR bond project in the Economic Development Region.20    (l) After the adoption of a STAR bond project plan by the 21corporate authorities of the political subdivision and 22approval by the Office of the Governor under subsection (d), 23the political subdivision may authorize the issuance of STAR 24bonds in one or more series to finance the STAR bond project or 25pay or reimburse any eligible project cost within the STAR 26bond district in accordance with the provisions of this Act.  HB5500- 39 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1    (m) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (n), the 2maximum maturity of STAR bonds issued to finance a STAR bond 3project shall not exceed 23 years from the first date of 4distribution of State sales tax increment from the STAR bond 5project to the political subdivision unless the political 6subdivision extends that maturity by resolution up to a 7maximum of 35 years from such first distribution date. Any 8such extension shall require the approval of the Office of the 9Governor, upon the recommendation of the Directors. In no 10event shall the maximum maturity date for any STAR bonds 11exceed that date which is 35 years from the first distribution 12date of the first STAR bonds issued in a STAR bond district.13    (n) The maximum maturity of STAR bonds issued to finance a 14STAR bond project located within a NOVA district shall not 15exceed 35 years from the first date of distribution of State 16sales tax increment from the STAR bond project to the 17political subdivision.18(Source: P.A. 104-453, eff. 12-12-25.) 19    (50 ILCS 475/5-45)20    Sec. 5-45. STAR bonds; source of payment. 21    (a) Any political subdivision shall have the power to 22issue STAR bonds in one or more series to finance the 23undertaking of any STAR bond project in accordance with the 24provisions of this Act and the Omnibus Bond Acts. Any STAR bond 25project approved under this Act may be completed in one or more   HB5500- 40 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1phases, and STAR bonds may be issued, in one or more series, to 2finance any STAR bond project or phase thereof. STAR bonds may 3be issued as revenue bonds, alternate bonds, or general 4obligation bonds as defined in and subject to the procedures 5provided in the Local Government Debt Reform Act.6    STAR bonds may be made payable, both as to principal and 7interest, from the following revenues, which, to the extent 8pledged by each respective political subdivision or other 9public entity for that purpose, shall constitute pledged STAR 10revenues:11        (1) revenues of the political subdivision derived from 12    or held in connection with the undertaking and carrying 13    out of any STAR bond project or projects under this Act;14        (2) available private funds and contributions, grants, 15    tax credits, or other financial assistance from the State 16    or federal government;17        (3) any taxes created under Section 5-50 and 18    designated as pledged STAR revenues by the political 19    subdivision;20        (4) all the local sales tax increment of a 21    municipality, county, or other unit of local government;22        (5) any special service area taxes collected within 23    the STAR bond district under the Special Service Area Tax 24    Act, which may be used for the purposes of funding project 25    costs or paying debt service on STAR bonds in addition to 26    the purposes contained in the special service area plan;  HB5500- 41 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1        (6) all the State sales tax increment;2        (7) any other revenues appropriated by the political 3    subdivision; and4        (8) any combination of these methods.5    (b) The political subdivision may pledge the pledged STAR 6revenues to the repayment of STAR bonds before, simultaneously 7with, or after the issuance of the STAR bonds.8    (c) Bonds issued as revenue bonds shall not be general 9obligations of the political subdivision, nor, in any event, 10shall they give rise to a charge against the political 11subdivision's general credit or taxing powers or be payable 12out of any funds or properties other than those set forth in 13subsection (a). The bonds shall so state on their face.14    (d) For each STAR bond project financed with STAR bonds 15payable from the pledged STAR revenues, the political 16subdivision shall prepare and submit to the Department, the 17Department of Revenue, the Office of the Governor, and the 18Governor's Office of Management and Budget by June 1 of each 19year a report describing the status of the STAR bond project, 20any expenditures of the proceeds of STAR bonds that have 21occurred for the preceding calendar year, and any expenditures 22of the proceeds of the bonds expected to occur in the future, 23including the amount of pledged STAR revenue, the amount of 24revenue that has been spent, the projected amount of the 25revenue, and the anticipated use of the revenue. Each annual 26report shall be accompanied by an affidavit of the master   HB5500- 42 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1developer certifying the contents of the report as true to the 2best of the master developer's knowledge. The Department shall 3have the right, but not the obligation, to request the Auditor 4General to review the annual report and the political 5subdivision's records containing the source information for 6the report for the purpose of verifying the report's contents. 7If the Auditor General declines the request for review, the 8Department shall have the right to select an independent 9third-party auditor to conduct an audit of the annual report 10and the political subdivision's records containing the source 11information for the report. The reasonable cost of the audit 12shall be paid by the master developer. The master development 13agreement shall grant the Department and the Auditor General 14the right to review the records of the political subdivision 15containing the source information for the report.16    (e) As soon as possible after the first day of each month, 17upon certification of the Department of Revenue, the 18Comptroller shall order transferred and the Treasurer shall 19transfer, from the General Revenue Fund to the STAR Bonds 20Revenue Fund, the State sales tax increment for the second 21preceding month, less 3% of that amount, which shall be 22transferred into the Tax Compliance and Administration Fund 23and shall be used by the Department of Revenue, subject to 24appropriation, to cover the costs of the Department of Revenue 25in administering this Act. As soon as possible after the first 26day of each month, upon certification of the Department of   HB5500- 43 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1Revenue, the Comptroller shall order transferred and the 2Treasurer shall transfer, from the Local Government Tax Fund 3to the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund, the local sales tax increment 4for the second preceding month, as provided in Section 6z-18 5of the State Finance Act and from the County and Mass Transit 6District Fund to the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund the local sales 7tax increment for the second preceding month, as provided in 8Section 6z-20 of the State Finance Act. On or before the 25th 9day of each calendar month, the Department of Revenue shall 10prepare and certify to the Comptroller the disbursement of 11stated sums of money out of the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund to 12named municipalities and counties, the municipalities and 13counties to be those entitled to distribution of taxes or 14penalties paid to the Department of Revenue during the second 15preceding calendar month. The amount to be paid to each 16municipality or county shall be the amount of the State sales 17tax increment and the local sales tax increment (not including 18credit memoranda or the amount transferred into the Tax 19Compliance and Administration Fund) collected during the 20second preceding calendar month by the Department of Revenue 21from retailers and servicepersons on transactions at places of 22business located within a STAR bond district in that 23municipality or county, plus an amount the Department of 24Revenue determines is necessary to offset any amounts which 25were erroneously paid to a different taxing body, and not 26including an amount equal to the amount of refunds made during   HB5500- 44 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1the second preceding calendar month by the Department of 2Revenue, and not including any amount which the Department of 3Revenue determines is necessary to offset any amounts which 4are payable to a different taxing body but were erroneously 5paid to the municipality or county. Within 10 days after 6receipt by the Comptroller of the disbursement certification 7to the municipalities and counties, which shall be given to 8the Comptroller by the Department of Revenue, the Comptroller 9shall cause the orders to be drawn for the respective amounts 10in accordance with the directions contained in the 11certification. When certifying the amount of monthly 12disbursement to a municipality or county under this 13subsection, the Department of Revenue shall increase or 14decrease that amount by an amount necessary to offset any 15misallocation of previous disbursements. The offset amount 16shall be the amount erroneously disbursed within the 6 months 17preceding the time a misallocation is discovered. 18Notwithstanding the foregoing, any local sales tax increment 19derived from local hotel taxes and visitor investment 20surcharges that are designated as pledged STAR revenues 21pursuant to this Act shall not be subject to certification, 22collection, transfer, or allocation by the Department of 23Revenue, Comptroller, or Treasurer, and shall instead be 24deposited directly by the political subdivision into the STAR 25Bond Revenues Fund in accordance with the applicable STAR bond 26project plan, ordinance, and bond documents.   HB5500- 45 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1    (f) The corporate authorities of the political subdivision 2shall deposit the proceeds for the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund 3into a special fund of the political subdivision called the 4"[Name of political subdivision] STAR Bond District Revenue 5Fund" for the purpose of paying or reimbursing STAR bond 6project costs and obligations incurred in the payment of those 7costs. If the political subdivision fails to issue STAR bonds 8within 180 days after the first distribution to the political 9subdivision from the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund, the Department 10of Revenue shall cease distribution of the State sales tax 11increment to the political subdivision, shall transfer any 12State sales tax increment in the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund to the 13General Revenue Fund, and shall cease deposits of State sales 14tax increment amounts into the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund. The 15political subdivision shall repay all the State sales tax 16increment distributed to the political subdivision to date, 17which amounts shall be deposited into the General Revenue 18Fund. If not repaid within 90 days after notice from the State, 19the Department of Revenue shall withhold distributions to the 20political subdivision from the Local Government Tax Fund until 21the excess amount is repaid, which withheld amounts shall be 22transferred to the General Revenue Fund. At such time as the 23political subdivision notifies the Department of Revenue in 24writing that it has issued STAR Bonds in accordance with this 25Act and provides the Department with a copy of the political 26subdivision's official statement, bond purchase agreements,   HB5500- 46 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1indenture, or other evidence of bond sale, the Department of 2Revenue shall resume deposits of the State sales tax increment 3into the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund and distribution of the State 4sales tax increment to the political subdivision in accordance 5with this Section.6    (g) If at any time after the seventh anniversary of the 7date of distribution of State sales tax increment from a STAR 8bond project the Auditor General determines that the 9percentage of the aggregate proceeds of STAR bonds issued to 10date that is derived from the State sales tax increment has 11exceeded 50% of the total development costs of that STAR Bonds 12project, no additional STAR bonds may be issued for that STAR 13Bonds project until that percentage is reduced to 50% or 14below. When the percentage has been reduced to 50% or below, 15the master developer shall have the right, at its own cost, to 16obtain a new audit prepared by an independent third-party 17auditor verifying compliance and shall provide such audit to 18the Auditor General for review and approval. Upon the Auditor 19General's determination from the audit that the percentage has 20been reduced to 50% or below, STAR bonds may again be issued 21for the STAR bond project.22(Source: P.A. 104-453, eff. 12-12-25.) 23    (50 ILCS 475/5-50)24    Sec. 5-50. STAR bond occupation taxes.25    (a) If the corporate authorities of a political   HB5500- 47 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1subdivision have established a STAR bond district and have 2elected to impose a tax by ordinance under subsection (b), or 3(c), or (c-10) of this Section, each year after the date of the 4adoption of the ordinance and until all STAR bond project 5costs and all political subdivision obligations financing the 6STAR bond project costs, if any, have been paid in accordance 7with the STAR bond project plans, but in no event longer than 8the maximum maturity date of the last of the STAR bonds issued 9for projects in the STAR bond district, all amounts generated 10by the retailers' occupation tax and service occupation tax 11shall be collected, and the tax shall be enforced, by the 12Department of Revenue in the same manner as all retailers' 13occupation taxes and service occupation taxes imposed in the 14political subdivision imposing the tax. The corporate 15authorities of the political subdivision shall deposit the 16proceeds of the taxes imposed under subsections (b), and (c), 17or (c-10) into either (i) a special fund held by the corporate 18authorities of the political subdivision called the STAR Bonds 19Tax Allocation Fund for the purpose of paying STAR bond 20project costs and obligations incurred in the payment of those 21costs if such taxes are designated as pledged STAR revenues by 22resolution or ordinance of the political subdivision or (ii) 23the political subdivision's general corporate fund if such 24taxes are not designated as pledged STAR revenues by 25resolution or ordinance.26    The tax imposed under this Section by a municipality may   HB5500- 48 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1be imposed only on the portion of a STAR bond district that is 2within the boundaries of the municipality. For any part of a 3STAR bond district that lies outside the boundaries of that 4municipality, the municipality in which the other part of the 5STAR bond district lies (or the county, in cases where a 6portion of the STAR bond district lies in the unincorporated 7area of a county) is authorized to impose the tax under this 8Section on that part of the STAR bond district.9    (b) The corporate authorities of a political subdivision 10that has established a STAR bond district under this Act may, 11by ordinance or resolution, impose a STAR Bond Retailers' 12Occupation Tax upon all persons engaged in the business of 13selling tangible personal property, other than an item of 14tangible personal property titled or registered with an agency 15of this State's government, at retail in the STAR bond 16district at a rate not to exceed 1% of the gross receipts from 17the sales made in the course of that business, to be imposed 18only in 0.25% increments. The tax may not be imposed on 19tangible personal property taxed at the 1% rate under the 20Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. The tax may not be imposed on 21aviation fuel for so long as the revenue use requirements of 49 22U.S.C. 47107(b) and 49 U.S.C. 47133 are binding on the 23political subdivision.24    The tax imposed under this subsection and all civil 25penalties that may be assessed as an incident thereof shall be 26collected and enforced by the Department of Revenue. The   HB5500- 49 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1certificate of registration that is issued by the Department 2of Revenue to a retailer under the Retailers' Occupation Tax 3Act shall permit the retailer to engage in a business that is 4taxable under any ordinance or resolution enacted under this 5subsection without registering separately with the Department 6of Revenue under such ordinance or resolution or under this 7subsection. The Department of Revenue shall have full power to 8administer and enforce this subsection, to collect all taxes 9and penalties due under this subsection in the manner 10hereinafter provided, and to determine all rights to credit 11memoranda arising on account of the erroneous payment of tax 12or penalty under this subsection. In the administration of, 13and compliance with, this subsection, the Department of 14Revenue and persons who are subject to this subsection shall 15have the same rights, remedies, privileges, immunities, 16powers, and duties, and be subject to the same conditions, 17restrictions, limitations, penalties, exclusions, exemptions, 18and definitions of terms and employ the same modes of 19procedure, as are prescribed in Sections 1, 1a through 1o, 2 20through 2-65 (in respect to all provisions therein other than 21the State rate of tax), 2c through 2h, 3 (except as to the 22disposition of taxes and penalties collected), 4, 5, 5a, 5b, 235c, 5d, 5e, 5f, 5g, 5i, 5j, 5k, 5l, 6, 6a, 6b, 6c, 7, 8, 9, 10, 2411, 12, 13, and 14 of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act and all 25provisions of the Uniform Penalty and Interest Act, as fully 26as if those provisions were set forth herein.  HB5500- 50 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1    If a tax is imposed under this subsection (b), a tax shall 2also be imposed under subsection (c) of this Section.3    (c) If a tax has been imposed under subsection (b), a STAR 4Bond Service Occupation Tax shall also be imposed upon all 5persons engaged, in the STAR bond district, in the business of 6making sales of service, who, as an incident to making those 7sales of service, transfer tangible personal property within 8the STAR bond district, either in the form of tangible 9personal property or in the form of real estate as an incident 10to a sale of service. The service occupation tax shall be 11imposed upon all persons engaged in the business of making 12sales of service at the same rate as the tax imposed in 13subsection (b) of the selling price of tangible personal 14property transferred within the STAR bond district by such 15servicemen as an incident to a sale of service and shall not 16exceed 1% and shall be imposed only in 0.25% increments. The 17tax may not be imposed on tangible personal property taxed at 18the 1% rate under the Service Occupation Tax Act. The tax may 19not be imposed on aviation fuel for so long as the revenue use 20requirements of 49 U.S.C. 47107(b) and 49 U.S.C. 47133 are 21binding on the political subdivision.22    The tax imposed under this subsection and all civil 23penalties that may be assessed as an incident thereof shall be 24collected and enforced by the Department of Revenue. The 25certificate of registration that is issued by the Department 26of Revenue to a retailer under the Retailers' Occupation Tax   HB5500- 51 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1Act or under the Service Occupation Tax Act shall permit the 2registrant to engage in a business that is taxable under any 3ordinance or resolution enacted under this subsection without 4registering separately with the Department of Revenue under 5that ordinance or resolution or under this subsection. The 6Department of Revenue shall have full power to administer and 7enforce this subsection, to collect all taxes and penalties 8due under this subsection, to dispose of taxes and penalties 9so collected in the manner provided in this Act, and to 10determine all rights to credit memoranda arising on account of 11the erroneous payment of tax or penalty under this subsection. 12In the administration of, and compliance with this subsection, 13the Department of Revenue and persons who are subject to this 14subsection shall have the same rights, remedies, privileges, 15immunities, powers, and duties, and be subject to the same 16conditions, restrictions, limitations, penalties, exclusions, 17exemptions, and definitions of terms and employ the same modes 18of procedure as are prescribed in Sections 2, 2a through 2d, 3 19through 3-50 (in respect to all provisions therein other than 20the State rate of tax), 4 (except that the reference to the 21State shall be to the STAR bond district), 5, 7, 8 (except that 22the jurisdiction to which the tax shall be a debt to the extent 23indicated in that Section 8 shall be the political 24subdivision), 9 (except as to the disposition of taxes and 25penalties collected, and except that the returned merchandise 26credit for this tax may not be taken against any State tax),   HB5500- 52 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b110, 11, 12 (except the reference therein to Section 2b of the 2Retailers' Occupation Tax Act), 13 (except that any reference 3to the State shall mean the political subdivision), the first 4paragraph of Section 15, and Sections 16, 17, 18, 19 and 20 of 5the Service Occupation Tax Act and all provisions of the 6Uniform Penalty and Interest Act, as fully as if those 7provisions were set forth herein.8    If a tax is imposed under this subsection (c), a tax shall 9also be imposed under subsection (b) of this Section.10    (c-10) The corporate authorities of any political 11subdivision that has established a STAR bond district under 12this Act may, by ordinance or resolution, impose an visitor 13investment surcharge upon all admission and charges from 14transactions at places of business located within such STAR 15bond district, at a rate not to exceed 9% of the gross receipts 16derived from any admission and charge within such STAR bond 17district, to be imposed only in 0.25% increments to pay for 18eligible project cost. The charge imposed under this 19subsection and all civil penalties that may be assessed as an 20incident thereof shall be collected and enforced by the 21political subdivision. For purposes of this section, "visitor 22investment surcharges" shall include, but shall not be limited 23to charges for: (a) admission or rental to any physical space 24or venue in which attendees gather for entertainment or 25amusement, including but not limited to facilities owned or 26operated by users, destination hotels, amusement parks,   HB5500- 53 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1hotels, entertainment venues, or traditional retailers, 2resorts, golf or pickle ball type facilities, simulator type 3facilities, music venues, water parks, RV parks, surf parks, 4ice rinks, family entertainment type facilities, zip line 5courses, wake boarding courses, miniature golf courses, 6go-cart tracks or facilities, arcades and other venues 7designed for the playing of video games, pinball machines, 8air-hockey, billiards tables, or other games operated by coins 9or other payment methods, theaters, trade shows and convention 10centers, and athletic stadiums or venues for the hosting of 11any athletic context; and (b) any separate charge for 12admission or rental to or use of entertainment attractions, 13rides, or other activities within the aforementioned venues. 14The provisions set out in this subsection (c-10) shall not be 15subject to subsection (d) of this Section. 16    (d) Persons subject to any tax imposed under this Section 17may reimburse themselves for their seller's tax liability 18under this Section by separately stating the tax as an 19additional charge, which charge may be stated in combination, 20in a single amount, with State taxes that sellers are required 21to collect under the Use Tax Act, in accordance with such 22bracket schedules as the Department may prescribe.23    Whenever the Department of Revenue determines that a 24refund should be made under this Section to a claimant the 25Department of Revenue shall not issue a credit memorandum. The 26Department of Revenue shall notify the State Comptroller, who   HB5500- 54 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1shall cause the order to be drawn for the amount specified and 2to the person named in the notification from the Department of 3Revenue. The refund shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of 4the STAR Bond Retailers' Occupation Tax Fund.5    Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the 6Department of Revenue shall immediately pay over to the State 7Treasurer, ex officio, as trustee, all taxes, penalties, and 8interest collected under this Section for deposit into the 9STAR Bond Retailers' Occupation Tax Fund. On or before the 1025th day of each calendar month, the Department of Revenue 11shall prepare and certify to the Comptroller the disbursement 12of stated sums of money to named political subdivisions from 13the STAR Bond Retailers' Occupation Tax Fund, the political 14subdivisions to be those from which retailers have paid taxes 15or penalties under this Section to the Department of Revenue 16during the second preceding calendar month. The amount to be 17paid to each political subdivision shall be the amount (not 18including credit memoranda) collected under this Section 19during the second preceding calendar month by the Department 20of Revenue plus an amount the Department of Revenue determines 21is necessary to offset any amounts that were erroneously paid 22to a different taxing body, and not including an amount equal 23to the amount of refunds made during the second preceding 24calendar month by the Department of Revenue, less 3% of that 25amount, which shall be deposited into the Tax Compliance and 26Administration Fund and shall be used by the Department of   HB5500- 55 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1Revenue, subject to appropriation, to cover the costs of the 2Department of Revenue in administering and enforcing the 3provisions of this Section, on behalf of such political 4subdivision, and not including any amount that the Department 5of Revenue determines is necessary to offset any amounts that 6were payable to a different taxing body but were erroneously 7paid to the political subdivision. Within 10 days after 8receipt by the Comptroller of the disbursement certification 9to the political subdivisions provided for in this Section to 10be given to the Comptroller by the Department, the Comptroller 11shall cause the orders to be drawn for the respective amounts 12in accordance with the directions contained in the 13certification. The proceeds of the tax paid to political 14subdivisions under this Section shall be deposited into either 15(i) the STAR Bonds Tax Allocation Fund by the political 16subdivision if the political subdivision has designated them 17as pledged STAR revenues by resolution or ordinance or (ii) 18the political subdivision's general corporate fund if the 19political subdivision has not designated them as pledged STAR 20revenues.21    An ordinance or resolution imposing or discontinuing the 22tax under this Section or effecting a change in the rate 23thereof shall either (i) be adopted and a certified copy 24thereof filed with the Department of Revenue on or before the 25first day of April, whereupon the Department of Revenue, if 26all other requirements of this Section are met, shall proceed   HB5500- 56 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1to administer and enforce this Section as of the first day of 2July next following the adoption and filing; or (ii) be 3adopted and a certified copy thereof filed with the Department 4of Revenue on or before the first day of October, whereupon, if 5all other requirements of this Section are met, the Department 6of Revenue shall proceed to administer and enforce this 7Section as of the first day of January next following the 8adoption and filing.9    The Department of Revenue shall not administer or enforce 10an ordinance imposing, discontinuing, or changing the rate of 11the tax under this Section until the political subdivision 12also provides, in the manner prescribed by the Department of 13Revenue, the boundaries of the STAR bond district and each 14address in the STAR bond district in such a way that the 15Department of Revenue can determine by its address whether a 16business is located in the STAR bond district. The political 17subdivision must provide this boundary and address information 18to the Department of Revenue on or before April 1 for 19administration and enforcement of the tax under this Section 20by the Department of Revenue beginning on the following July 1 21and on or before October 1 for administration and enforcement 22of the tax under this Section by the Department of Revenue 23beginning on the following January 1. The Department of 24Revenue shall not administer or enforce any change made to the 25boundaries of a STAR bond district or any address change, 26addition, or deletion until the political subdivision reports   HB5500- 57 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1the boundary change or address change, addition, or deletion 2to the Department of Revenue in the manner prescribed by the 3Department of Revenue. The political subdivision must provide 4this boundary change or address change, addition, or deletion 5information to the Department of Revenue on or before April 1 6for administration and enforcement by the Department of 7Revenue of the change, addition, or deletion beginning on the 8following July 1 and on or before October 1 for administration 9and enforcement by the Department of Revenue of the change, 10addition, or deletion beginning on the following January 1. 11The retailers in the STAR bond district shall be responsible 12for charging the tax imposed under this Section. If a retailer 13is incorrectly included or excluded from the list of those 14required to collect the tax under this Section, both the 15Department of Revenue and the retailer shall be held harmless 16if they reasonably relied on information provided by the 17political subdivision.18    A political subdivision that imposes the tax under this 19Section must submit to the Department of Revenue any other 20information as the Department of Revenue may require that is 21necessary for the administration and enforcement of the tax.22    When certifying the amount of a monthly disbursement to a 23political subdivision under this Section, the Department of 24Revenue shall increase or decrease the amount by an amount 25necessary to offset any misallocation of previous 26disbursements. The offset amount shall be the amount   HB5500- 58 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1erroneously disbursed within the previous 6 months from the 2time a misallocation is discovered.3    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to authorize 4the political subdivision to impose a tax upon the privilege 5of engaging in any business which under the Constitution of 6the United States may not be made the subject of taxation by 7this State.8    The provisions of this subsection (d) shall only apply to 9taxes imposed under subsection (b) and subsection (c)of this 10Section. 11    (e) When STAR bond project costs, including, without 12limitation, all political subdivision obligations financing 13STAR bond project costs, have been paid, any surplus funds 14then remaining in the STAR Bonds Tax Allocation Fund shall be 15distributed to the treasurer of the political subdivision for 16deposit into the political subdivision's general corporate 17fund. Upon payment of all STAR bond project costs and 18retirement of obligations, but in no event later than the 19maximum maturity date of the last of the STAR bonds issued in 20the STAR bond district, the political subdivision shall adopt 21an ordinance immediately rescinding the taxes imposed under 22this Section and file a certified copy of the ordinance with 23the Department of Revenue in the form and manner as described 24in this Section.25(Source: P.A. 104-453, eff. 12-12-25.)   HB5500- 59 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1    (50 ILCS 475/5-75)2    Sec. 5-75. Reporting taxes. 3    (a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the 4contrary, the Department of Revenue shall provide a certified 5report of the State sales tax increment and local sales tax 6increment from all taxpayers within a STAR bond district to 7the bond trustee, escrow agent, or paying agent for such bonds 8upon the written request of the political subdivision on or 9before the 25th day of each month. Such report shall provide a 10detailed allocation of State sales tax increment and local 11sales tax increment from each local sales tax and State sales 12tax reported to the Department of Revenue.13    The bond trustee, escrow agent, or paying agent shall keep 14such sales and use tax reports and the information contained 15therein confidential, but may use such information for 16purposes of allocating and depositing the sales and use tax 17revenues in connection with the bonds used to finance project 18costs in such STAR bond district. Except as otherwise provided 19in this Section, the sales and use tax reports received by the 20bond trustee, escrow agent, or paying agent shall be subject 21to the confidentiality provisions of Section 11 of the 22Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. Notwithstanding the provisions 23of this Section, any local sales tax increment derived from 24local hotel taxes and visitor investment surcharges that are 25designated as pledged STAR revenues pursuant to this Act shall 26not be included in the Department of Revenue's certified   HB5500- 60 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1report and shall instead be reported to the bond trustee, 2escrow agent, or paying agent by the political subdivision in 3such form and manner as may be provided in the applicable bond 4documents. 5    (b) The political subdivision shall determine when the 6amount of sales tax and other revenues that have been 7collected and distributed to the bond debt service or reserve 8fund is sufficient to satisfy all principal and interest costs 9to the maturity date or dates of any STAR bond issued by a 10political subdivision to finance a STAR bond project and shall 11give the Department of Revenue written notice of such 12determination. The notice shall include a date certain on 13which deposits into the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund for that STAR 14bond project shall terminate and shall be provided to the 15Department of Revenue at least 60 days prior to that date. 16Thereafter, all sales tax and other revenues shall be 17collected and distributed in accordance with applicable law.18    If the political subdivision fails to give timely notice 19under this subsection (b), the Department of Revenue, upon 20discovery of this failure, shall cease distribution of the 21State sales tax increment to the political subdivision, shall 22transfer any State sales tax increment in the STAR Bonds 23Revenue Fund to the General Revenue Fund, and shall cease 24deposits of State sales tax increment amounts into the STAR 25Bonds Revenue Fund. Any amount of State sales tax increment 26distributed to the political subdivision from the STAR Bonds   HB5500- 61 -LRB104 19454 HLH 34246 b1Revenue Fund in excess of the amount sufficient to satisfy all 2principal and interest costs to the maturity date or dates of 3any STAR bond issued by the political subdivision to finance a 4STAR bond project shall be repaid to the Department of Revenue 5and deposited into the General Revenue Fund. If not repaid 6within 90 days after notice from the State, the Department of 7Revenue shall withhold distributions to the political 8subdivision from the Local Government Tax Fund until the 9excess amount is repaid, which withheld amounts shall be 10transferred to the General Revenue Fund.11(Source: P.A. 104-453, eff. 12-12-25.)